Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6166.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 36-14 of the General Laws entitled "Code of Ethics" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
36-14-22. Prohibiting sexual harassment.
(a) Sexual harassment is prohibited. For purposes of this section, "sexual harassment"
means any sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, and other verbal, nonverbal, or physical
contact of a sexual nature, that a reasonable person would find inappropriate.
(b) This section applies to all of the following individuals, while they are actively engaged
in activities that involve legislative business:
(1) Senators and representatives;
(2) Regular, full-time, part-time, temporary or contractual employees of the general
assembly;
(3) Volunteers, interns, and pages; and
(4) Lobbyists.
(c) Complaints under this section, shall be made to the Rhode Island ethics commission
established pursuant to the provisions of § 36-14-8, and will be investigated, in accordance with
the provisions of § 36-14-12. To the extent practicable, the investigation shall respect the privacy
of all individuals involved.
(d) If the investigation supports a finding of a violation of the provisions of this section,
the ethics commission shall order prompt and effective remedial action including, but not limited

to, a warning, reprimand, withholding of a promotion or pay increase, reassignment, temporary
suspension without pay, termination or other appropriate punishment the commission deems
appropriate.
(e) Each individual covered by this section shall complete an annual education and training
program on sexual harassment, consistent with the aims and purposes of this section. Program
completion records shall be maintained by the Rhode Island ethics commission and be made
available to the public. Failure to comply, shall result in disciplinary action including, but not
limited to, any penalty available under subsection (d) of this section.
(f) On or before December 1, 2026, the Rhode Island ethics commission shall issue rules
effectuating this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002649
========
LC002649 - Page 2 of 3